Missouri, session 2026, SB929.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 376.1240, RSMo, is repealed and one
new section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section
376.1240, to read as follows:
376.1240. 1. For purposes of this section, terms
shall have the same meanings as ascribed to them in section
376.1350, and the term "self-administered hormonal
contraceptive" shall mean a drug that is composed of one or
more hormones and that is approved by the Food and Drug
Administration to prevent pregnancy, excluding emergency
contraception. Nothing in this section shall be construed
to apply to medications approved by the Food and Drug
Administration to terminate an existing pregnancy.
2. (1) Any health benefit plan delivered, issued for
delivery, continued, or renewed in this state on or after
January 1, 2026, that provides coverage for self-
administered hormonal contraceptives shall provide coverage
to reimburse a health care provider or dispensing entity for
the dispensing of a supply of self-administered hormonal
contraceptives intended to last up to ninety days, or
intended to last up to one hundred eighty days for generic

SB 929 2
self-administered hormonal contraceptives. The provisions
of this section shall no longer be in effect after December
31, 2026.
(2) Any health benefit plan delivered, issued for
delivery, continued, or renewed in this state on or after
January 1, 2027, that provides coverage for self-
administered hormonal contraceptives shall provide coverage
to reimburse a health care provider or dispensing entity for
the dispensing of a supply of self-administered hormonal
contraceptives, including generic and brand-name
contraceptives, intended to last up to one year.
3. The coverage required under this section shall not
be subject to any greater deductible or co-payment than
other similar health care services provided by the health
benefit plan.
✓